District of Columbia statutes.
4-220.02

Nonabatement of causes of action.

The enactment of this chapter shall not cause the abatement of any causes of action affecting public enactments repealed by this title.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 2103, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-220.2.
“This title,” referred to at the end of this section, is title XXI of D.C. Law 4-101.